Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1277
Legal notices and other facts provable by affidavit; perpetuation of proof.

Proof made as provided in sections 25-1274 to 25-1276, may be perpetuated and preserved for future use by filing the papers above mentioned in the office of the county judge, and the original affidavit appended to the notice or paper, if there be one, and if not the affidavit, by itself, is presumptive evidence of the facts stated therein, but does not preclude other modes of proof permitted by law.

R.S.1867, Code § 406, p. 461;

R.S.1913, § 7970;

C.S.1922, § 8911;

C.S.1929, § 20-1277;

R.S.1943, § 25-1277.